Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 10. Employment Practices and Working Conditions.

Collateral references. —

Laurie E. Leader, Wages and Hours: Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Lex K. Larson, Larson’s Employment Discrimination (Matthew Bender).

Janice Goodman, Employee Rights Litigation: Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Lex K. Larson, Unjust Dismissal (Matthew Bender).

Lex K. Larson, Employment Screening (Matthew Bender).